Alabama, session 2026rs, SB102.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Pursuant to the Alabama Sunset Law, the
Sunset Committee recommends the continuance of the Board of
Home Medical Equipment until October 1, 2027.
Section 2. The existence and functioning of the Board
of Home Medical Equipment, created and functioning pursuant to
Sections 34-14C-1 to 34-14C-8, inclusive, Code of Alabama
1975, is continued until October 1, 2027, and those code
sections are expressly preserved.
Section 3. The Legislature concurs in the
recommendations of the Sunset Committee as provided in
Sections 1 and 2.
Section 4. This act shall become effective June 1,
2026.
Page 1

2026.
SB102 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB102
Senate 20-Jan-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 19-Feb-26




By: Senator Kelley
Page 2